Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 4. Multistate Trust Institutions.

§ 6.2-1065.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Acquisition of a trust office”
means the acquisition of a trust office located in a host state, without acquiring the trust institution of such office.

“Bank”
has the meaning assigned to it in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(a)(1) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1811 et seq.), as amended.

“Bank supervisory agency”
means: (i) any agency of another state with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising a trust institution and (ii) the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and any successor to these agencies.

“Home state”
means (i) with respect to a federally chartered trust institution, the state where such institution maintains its principal office and (ii) with respect to any other trust institution, the state that chartered such institution.

“Home state regulator”
means the bank supervisory agency with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising an out-of-state trust institution.

“Host state”
means a state, other than the home state of a trust institution, in which the trust institution maintains or seeks to acquire or establish an office.

“New trust office”
means a trust office located in a host state that (i) is originally established by the trust institution as a trust office and (ii) does not become a trust office of the trust institution as a result of (a) the acquisition of another trust institution or trust office of another trust institution or (b) a merger, consolidation, or conversion involving any such trust institution or trust office.

“Office”
with respect to a trust institution means the principal office or a trust office, but not a branch.

“Out-of-state bank”
means a bank chartered to act as a fiduciary whose home state is a state other than the Commonwealth.

“Out-of-state trust company”
means a trust company or trust subsidiary whose home state is a state other than the Commonwealth.

“Out-of-state trust institution”
means a trust institution whose home state is a state other than the Commonwealth.

“Principal office”
with respect to (i) a state trust company, means a location designated by such trust company as its main office pursuant to §

6.2-1028

or

6.2-1047

or (ii) a trust institution other than a state trust company, means its principal place of business in the United States.

“State bank”
or

“Virginia state bank”

means a bank chartered under the laws of the Commonwealth and permitted to engage in the trust business pursuant to §

6.2-819

.

“State trust company”
means a corporation organized or reorganized as a trust company under Article 2 (§

6.2-1013

et seq.) or Article 3 (§

6.2-1047

et seq.) of this chapter.

“State trust institution”
means a trust institution having its principal office in the Commonwealth.

“Trust company”
means a state trust company or any other entity chartered to act as a fiduciary that is not a bank.

“Trust institution”
means a bank or trust company chartered by a state bank supervisory agency or by the Office of the Comptroller of Currency.

“Trust office”
means an office at which a trust institution engages in a trust business and not in the banking business.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.32; 2010, c. 794.

Cross references.

As to the powers and duties of the State Corporation Commission, see §§

12.1-12

through

12.1-17

.

§ 6.2-1066.
Interstate trust offices by Virginia state banks.

With the prior approval of the Commission, any Virginia state bank or state trust company may establish a new trust office or acquire a trust office in a state other than the Commonwealth.

A Virginia state bank or state trust company desiring to establish and maintain a trust office in another state under this section shall file an application or notice on a form prescribed by the Commission and pay the branch application fee set forth in subdivision B 3 of §

6.2-908

. If the Commission finds that the applicant has the financial resources sufficient to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its soundness and that the laws of the host state permit the establishment of the trust office, it may approve the application. In acting on the application, the Commission shall consider the views of the state bank supervisor of the host state where the trust office is proposed to be located.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.33; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1067.
Trust business of out-of-state trust institution.

An out-of-state trust institution that establishes or maintains one or more offices in the Commonwealth under this article may conduct any activity at each such office that would be authorized under the laws of the Commonwealth for a state trust institution to conduct at such an office.

An out-of-state trust institution may engage in a trust business in the Commonwealth if it (i) maintains (a) a trust office in the Commonwealth as permitted by this article or (b) a branch in the Commonwealth, or (ii) is a national bank or federal savings bank, with or without an office or a branch in the Commonwealth, that is supervised and regulated by the federal Comptroller of the Currency and is authorized to serve as trustee, as executor, as administrator, or in another fiduciary capacity pursuant to § 92a of the National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. § 21 et seq.) or § 5(n) of the Home Owners’ Loan Act (12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq.).

History.

1999, c. 835, §§ 6.1-32.34, 6.1-32.35; 2010, c. 794; 2012, c. 608.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 608 rewrote subsection B, which formerly read “An out-of-state trust institution may engage in a trust business at an office in the Commonwealth only if it maintains (i) a trust office in the Commonwealth as permitted by this article or (ii) a branch in the Commonwealth.”

§ 6.2-1068.
Establishing or acquiring an interstate trust office; additional trust offices; notice of closure.

An out-of-state trust institution that does not already maintain a trust office in the Commonwealth and that meets the requirements of this article may:

Establish and maintain a new trust office in the Commonwealth; or

Acquire and maintain a trust office in the Commonwealth.

An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in the Commonwealth under this article may establish or acquire additional trust offices in the Commonwealth to the same extent that a state trust institution may establish or acquire additional offices in the Commonwealth, provided it follows the procedures for establishing or acquiring such offices set forth in this article.

An out-of-state trust institution that maintains an office in the Commonwealth under this article shall give at least 30 days’ prior written notice, or in the case of an emergency transaction, such shorter notice as is consistent with applicable state or federal law, to the Commission of any merger, consolidation, or other transaction involving the trust institution that would cause any trust office operated by the institution in this state to be maintained by another trust institution or cause the operation of such an office to cease.

History.

1999, c. 835, §§ 6.1-32.36, 6.1-32.37, 6.1-32.42, 6.1-32.44; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1069.
Filing requirements.

An out-of-state trust institution desiring to establish and maintain a new trust office or acquire and maintain a trust office in the Commonwealth pursuant to this article shall submit to the Commission a copy of the application or notice it files with its home state regulator or the responsible federal bank supervisory agency to establish or acquire such office. Such submission shall be made at the same time the application or notice is filed by the out-of-state trust institution with such home state regulator or responsible federal bank supervisory agency. The out-of-state trust institution shall also comply with the requirements of Article 17 (§

13.1-757

et seq.) of the Virginia Stock Corporation Act and pay any filing fee required by the Commission.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.38; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1070.
Conditions for approval.

A trust office of an out-of-state trust institution shall not be acquired or established under this article unless:

In the case of a new trust office, the laws of the home state of the out-of-state trust institution permit state trust institutions to establish and maintain new trust offices in that state under substantially the same terms as set forth in this article.

In the case of a trust office to be established through the acquisition of a trust office, the laws of the home state of the out-of-state trust institution permit state trust institutions to establish and maintain trust offices in that state through the acquisition of trust offices under substantially the same terms as set forth in this article.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.39; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1071.
Examinations; periodic reports; cooperative agreements; assessment of fees.

The Commission may make such examinations of any office established and maintained in the Commonwealth pursuant to this article by an out-of-state trust institution as the Commission may deem necessary to determine whether the office is operating in compliance with the laws of the Commonwealth and to ensure the office is being operated in a safe and sound manner. The provisions of §

6.2-901

that apply to examinations of banks shall apply to examinations of an office conducted under this section. The Commission shall also have authority to examine the principal office of an out-of-state trust institution, as necessary. When any such examination is conducted outside the Commonwealth, the out-of-state trust institution shall be liable for and shall pay to the Commission within 30 days of the presentation of an itemized statement, the actual travel and reasonable living expenses incurred on account of such examination, or shall pay for such examination at a reasonable per diem rate approved by the Commission.

The Commission may require periodic reports from any out-of-state trust institution that maintains an office in the Commonwealth to the extent such reporting requirements (i) apply equally to similarly situated trust institutions having Virginia as their home state and (ii) are not preempted by federal laws. Such reports shall be filed under oath with such frequency and in such scope and detail as may be appropriate for the purpose of assuring continuing compliance with the provisions of this article.

The Commission may enter into cooperative agreements with the appropriate state bank supervisors and federal bank regulatory agencies for the examination of any trust office in the Commonwealth of an out-of-state trust institution or any office of a state trust institution in any host state, and may accept such agency’s report of examination and report of investigation in lieu of conducting its own examinations or investigations. The Commission may enter into joint actions with other state bank supervisors and federal banking agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any office maintained in this state by an out-of-state trust institution or any office established and maintained by a state trust institution in any host state; however, the Commission may take such actions independently to carry out its responsibilities under this article and to assure compliance with the laws of the Commonwealth.

Out-of-state trust institutions may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth and regulations of the Commission. Such fees may be shared with other state and federal bank supervisory agencies in accordance with agreements between them and the Commission.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.40; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1072.
Enforcement.

If the Commission determines that there is any violation of any applicable law or regulation in the operation of an out-of-state trust institution engaged in business in this state or that a trust office of such an institution in this state is being operated in an unsafe and unsound manner, the Commission shall have authority to undertake such enforcement actions as it would be permitted to take if the office were a Virginia state bank or state trust company.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.41; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1073.
Regulations; fees.

The Commission may adopt such regulations, and may provide for the payment of such reasonable application and administration fees, as it finds necessary and appropriate in order to implement the provisions of this article.

History.

1999, c. 835, § 6.1-32.43; 2010, c. 794.